Louisiana, session 2026, HB254.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 1543 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
Art. 1543. Manual gift
A. The Except for the donation of a motor vehicle, the donation inter vivos
of a corporeal movable may also be made by delivery of the thing to the donee
without any other formality.
B. The donation inter vivos of a motor vehicle shall be made only to the
following:
(1) Ascendants, descendants, or collaterals of the donor.
(2) Charitable organizations.
(3) Post-secondary institutions of higher education.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-23 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 254